Arkansas, session 2025, SB466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Wind power device
height moratorium — Study on long-term effects of wind power devices on
wildlife — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "wind power device" means a device,
including a windmill, wind farm, or wind turbine, that is designed to use the
kinetic energy of moving air to provide mechanical energy or to produce
electricity.
(b)(1) On and after the effective date of this act, a wind power
device is prohibited from exceeding one hundred fifty feet (150 ft.) in
height.
(2) The prohibition or moratorium under subdivision (b)(1) of
*JMB449*
03/16/2025 11:30:33 AM JMB449

SB466
this section shall expire on July 1, 2027.
(3) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not apply to a wind
power device if the wind power device is under construction, has broken
ground, or is in operation before March 21, 2025.
(c)(1)(A) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission shall conduct a
study regarding the effects of wind power devices.
(B) The study under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section
shall primarily focus on migratory waterfowl and predatory birds, also known
as raptors.
(2) The commission may:
(A) Contract with an entity to conduct the study under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section; and
(B) Partner with a state or federal agency, an
environmental consultant, nonprofit organization, or institution of higher
education in this state to conduct the study under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that wind energy may have
detrimental effects on wildlife and the environment with birds, including
raptors, being at a greater risk of being impacted by wind power devices;
that waterfowl populations in this state are declining and immediate
conservation is needed to ensure that the waterfowl and raptor populations
increase; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure conservation
of migratory waterfowl and raptor populations in this state as preserving
waterfowl and raptor populations contributes to the economy of this state
through tourism and hunting activities, which directly impacts the citizens
of this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act
being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
03/16/2025 11:30:33 AM JMB449